Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,130.05
Historical license plates; model-year license plates; validity.

License plates issued or used pursuant to section 60-3,130 or 60-3,130.04 shall be valid while the vehicle is owned by the applicant without the payment of any additional fee, tax, or license.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 29.